fst/morphology/affixes/verb_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON VTA_CNJ_PL
! 1Pl ->
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2t%>âhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>â%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2t%>âhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>â%>yâhkik VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâyâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
! 21Pl ->
+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>yahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâyahk VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>yêkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâyêk VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Pl ->
+3Pl+1SgO:%>ic%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2%>skik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>yâhkik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>yahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>yêkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>âc%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâcik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 4Sg/Pl ->
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2%>mit VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2%>misk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2ko%>t VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>cik VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>â%>ýit VERBS_Endlex ;
! 5Sg/Pl ->
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>ýit VERBS_Endlex ;
! Unspecified actor
+X+1SgO:%>i2kawi%>yân VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2SgO:%>i2kawi%>yan VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+3SgO:%>i2ht VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+1PlO:%>i2kawi%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+21PlO:%>i2kawi%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2PlO:%>i2kawi%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+3PlO:%>i2hc%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+4Sg/PlO:%>i2miht VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>cik VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>ýit VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_PL_DIM
! 1Pl ->
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2t%>i%^DIMs%>âhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2t%>i%^DIMs%>âhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yâhkik VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâyâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
! 21Pl ->
+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâyahk VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yêkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâyêk VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Pl ->
+3Pl+1SgO:%>ic%>i%^DIMs%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>skik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yâhkik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yêkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>cik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâcik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 4Sg/Pl ->
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mit VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>misk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>t VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>cik VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>ýit VERBS_Endlex ;
! 5Sg/Pl ->
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>ýit VERBS_Endlex ;
! X (Unspecified actor) ->
+X+1SgO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>yân VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2SgO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>yan VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+3SgO:%>i2ht%>i%^DIMs VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+1PlO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+21PlO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2PlO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+3PlO:%>i2hc%>i%^DIMs%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+4Sg/PlO:%>i2miht%>i%^DIMs VERBS_Endlex ;
! 0Sg/Pl (Inanimate actor) ->
+%0Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>cik VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>ýit VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_COND_PL ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_COND_SG ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_COND_PL_DIM ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_COND_SG_DIM ;

LEXICON VTA_COND_SG
! 1Sg ->
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2t%>ân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3SgO:%>a%>k%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2t%>ak%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>a%>kwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mak%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Sg ->
+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>yan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>a%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>a%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mac%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Sg ->
+3Sg+1SgO:%>ic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2s%>k%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2ko%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2ko%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2ko%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2ko%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ; 
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>âc%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâc%>i VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2ko%>yân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2ko%>yan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2ko%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_COND_SG_DIM
! 1Sg ->
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2t%>i%^DIMs%>ân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3SgO:%>a%>s%^DIMi%>k%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2t%>i%^DIMis%>ak%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>a%>s%^DIMi%>kwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mak%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Sg ->
+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>yan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>a%>s%^DIMi%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>a%>s%^DIMi%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mac%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Sg ->
+3Sg+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>sk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ; 
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâc%>i VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_COND_PL
! 1Pl ->
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2t%>âhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>â%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2t%>âhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>â%>yâhkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâyâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
! 21Pl ->
+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ; ! Variant in Alberta
+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>yahkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâyahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâyahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>yêkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâyêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Pl ->
+3Pl+1SgO:%>it%>wâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2s%>kwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>yâhkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>yahkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>yêkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>â%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>mâtwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152
! 4Sg/Pl ->
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2%>mic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2%>misk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2ko%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>â%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152
! 5Sg/Pl ->
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
! X ->
+X+1SgO:%>i2kawi%>yân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2SgO:%>i2kawi%>yan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+3SgO:%>i2hc%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+1PlO:%>i2kawi%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+21PlO:%>i2kawi%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2PlO:%>i2kawi%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+3PlO:%>ihtwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mihc%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_COND_PL_DIM
! 1Pl ->
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2t%>i%^DIMs%>âhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2t%>i%^DIMs%>âhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yâhkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâyâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
! 21Pl ->
+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ; ! Variant in Alberta
+21Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yahkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâyahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâyahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+2Pl+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>yêkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâyêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Pl ->
+3Pl+1SgO:%>it%>i%^DIMs%>wâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2s%>i%^DIMs%>kwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yâhkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yahkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yêkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mâtwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152
! 4Sg/Pl ->
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>mic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2%>s%^DIMi%>misk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>cvi VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152
! 5Sg/Pl ->
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
! X ->
+X+1SgO:%>i2kawi%>%s^DIMi%>yân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2SgO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>yan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+3SgO:%>i2hc%>i%^DIMs%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+1PlO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+21PlO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2PlO:%>i2kawi%>s%^DIMi%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+3PlO:%>i2htwaw%>i%^DIMs%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mihc%>i%^DIMs%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
! Inanimate actor
+%0Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+%0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2ko%>s%^DIMi%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_ImperativeSuffixes
@R.infl.VTA@ VTA_IMP ;
@R.infl.VTA-t@ VTA-t_IMP ;
@R.infl.VTA-i@ VTA-i_IMP ;

LEXICON VTA_IMP
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_IMP_SG ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_IMP_PL ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.PL@ VTA_IMP_SG_DIM ;
@R.diminutive.DIM@@D.number.SG@ VTA_IMP_PL_DIM ;

LEXICON VTA_IMP_SG
! Immediate
! 2Sg ->
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>i%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 2Sg ->
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>â%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>â%>hkanik VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IMP_SG_DIM
! Immediate
! 2Sg ->
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>n VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:%>i%^DIMs VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>nân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>i%>s%^DIMi%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 2Sg ->
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2%>s%^DIMi%>hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>â%>s%^DIMi%>hkanik VERBS_Endlex ;
